Illinois, session 104th, SB634.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Local Records Act is amended by adding 5Section 30 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 205/30 new)7    Sec. 30. Contracts of $5,000,000 or more.8    (a) A municipality must compile and maintain a list of 9each contract it enters into for $5,000,000 or more for public 10infrastructure projects. The list shall be available for 11public inspection or copying and on the municipality's 12website.13    (b) A home rule municipality may not compile or maintain a 14list of contracts it enters into for $5,000,000 or more in a 15manner that is inconsistent with this Section. This Section is 16a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII 17of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent exercise by 18home rule units of powers and functions exercised by the 19State.